North Carolina, session 2025, HB429.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-79.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-79.4. Special registration plates.
…
(b) Types. – The Division shall issue the following types of special registration plates:
…
(251) Turtle Rescue Team. – Expired July 1, 2016.Issuable to the registered owner
of a motor vehicle in accordance with G.S. 20-81.12. The plate shall bear a
phrase and logo selected by the North Carolina State University College of
Veterinary Medicine Turtle Rescue Team.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-79.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-79.7. Fees for special registration plates and distribution of the fees.
…
(a1) Fees. – All other special registration plates are subject to the regular motor vehicle
registration fee in G.S. 20-87 or G.S. 20-88 plus an additional fee in the following amount:

Special Plate Additional Fee Amount
…
Turtle Rescue Team Expired July 1, 2016$30.00
…
(b) Distribution of Fees. – The Special Registration Plate Account and the Collegiate and
Cultural Attraction Plate Account are established within the Highway Fund. The Division must
credit the additional fee imposed for the special registration plates listed in subsection (a1) of this
section among the Special Registration Plate Account (SRPA), the Collegiate and Cultural
Attraction Plate Account (CCAPA), the North Carolina Land and Water Fund (NCLWF) which
is established under G.S. 143B-135.234, and the Parks and Recreation Trust Fund, which is
established under G.S. 143B-135.56, as follows:

Special Plate SRPA CCAPA NCLWF PRTF
…
Turtle Rescue Team – Expired
*H429-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
July 1, 2016 $10 $20 0 0
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 20-81.12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-81.12. Collegiate insignia plates and certain other special plates.
…
(b156) Turtle Rescue Team. – Expired July 1, 2016.The Division shall transfer quarterly the
money in the Collegiate and Cultural Attraction Plate Account derived from the sale of Turtle
Rescue Team plates to the North Carolina State University College of Veterinary Medicine Turtle
Rescue Team to support its mission of providing medical, surgical, and husbandry services free
of charge in the hope of releasing rehabilitated turtles back into the wild.
…."
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 429-First Edition